Massachusetts, session 194th, H1892.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 4 of chapter 185 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “county”, in line 30, the following words:-  
“, at least 1 sitting each week in Nantucket county, at least 1 sitting each week in Dukes 
county.”